Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1715
Collection of taxes; personal tax roll; publication fees.

Payment for publication of the personal tax roll shall be made in the same manner as the publication of commissioners' proceedings; Provided, the total charge for publication shall not exceed the rate paid for publishing commissioners' proceedings.

Laws 1915, c. 226, § 4, p. 527;

C.S.1922, § 6009;

C.S.1929, § 77-1914;

R.S.1943, § 77-1715;

Laws 1959, c. 353, § 4, p. 1245;

Laws 1961, c. 377, § 8, p. 1161.

For legal rate for publications, see section 33-141.